Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5714
Number of new employees, defined.

(1) Number of new employees, for a tier 1, tier 2, tier 3, or tier 4 project, means the number of equivalent employees that are employed at the project during a year that are in excess of the number of equivalent employees during the base year, not to exceed the number of equivalent employees employed at the project during a year who are not base-year employees and who are paid wages at a rate equal to at least sixty percent of the Nebraska average weekly wage for the year of application.

(2) Number of new employees, for a tier 6 project, means the number of equivalent employees that are employed at the project during a year that are in excess of the number of equivalent employees during the base year, not to exceed the number of equivalent employees employed at the project during a year who are not base-year employees and who are paid at a rate equal to or greater than the tier 6 weekly required compensation for the year of application.

(3) Teleworkers working for wages or salaries in Nebraska from their residences for a taxpayer on tasks interdependent with the work performed at the project shall be considered to be employed at the project.

(4) Employees who work at a military installation in Nebraska for a taxpayer on tasks interdependent with the work performed at the project shall be considered to be employed at the project.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 36;

Laws 2008, LB895, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB164, § 3.